Utah statutes.
78B-6-1225.   Sales on credit -- Order for.
The court shall, in the order of sale, direct the terms of credit which may be
allowed for the purchase money of any portion of the premises.  For that
portion of which the purchase money is required, the court shall also order it
to be invested for the benefit of unknown owners, minors or parties out of the
state.
